Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2616
Civil remedies.

(1) An educational institution has a right
of action against an athlete agent or a former student-athlete for damages
caused by a violation of the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act. In an action
under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party costs and
reasonable attorney's fees.

(2) Damages of an educational
institution under subsection (1) of this section include losses and expenses
incurred because, as a result of the conduct of an athlete agent or a former
student-athlete, the educational institution was injured by a violation of
the act or was penalized, disqualified, or suspended from participation in
athletics by a national association for the promotion and regulation of athletics,
by an athletic conference, or by reasonable self-imposed disciplinary action
taken to mitigate sanctions likely to be imposed by such an organization.

(3) A right of action
under this section does not accrue until the educational institution discovers
or by the exercise of reasonable diligence would have discovered the violation
by the athlete agent or former student-athlete.

(4) Any liability of the athlete
agent or the former student-athlete under this section is several and not
joint.

(5)
The act does not restrict rights, remedies, or defenses of any person under
law or equity.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 16.